Illinois, session 104th, HB696.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Newspaper Legal Notice Act is amended by 5changing Section 0.01 as follows: 6    (715 ILCS 10/0.01)  (from Ch. 100, par. 9.9)7    Sec. 0.01. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Newspaper Legal Notice Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-1324.)